Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-214
Antitrust matters; labor of human beings; exempt.

Anything in sections 59-821, 59-828, 59-829, and 84-211 to 84-214 to the contrary notwithstanding the labor of human beings shall not be construed to be an article of commerce or commodity of business and shall be exempt from the provisions of sections 59-821, 59-828, 59-829, and 84-211 to 84-214.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 7.